Utah statutes.
17-43-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Department" means the Department of Human Services created in Section
62A-1-102.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health
created within the Department of Human Services in Section 62A-1-105.
